Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 2. Entry Permit System.

Sec. 16.43.140.
Permit required.

A person may not operate gear in the commercial taking of fishery resources without a valid entry permit or a valid interim-use permit issued by the commission.

A permit is not required of a crewmember or other person assisting in the operation of a unit of gear engaged in the commercial taking of fishery resources as long as the holder of the entry permit or the interim-use permit for that particular unit of gear is at all times present and actively engaged in the operation of the gear.

A person may hold more than one interim-use or entry permit issued or transferred under this chapter only for the following purposes:

fishing more than one type of gear;

fishing in more than one administrative area;

harvesting particular species for which separate interim-use or entry permits are issued;

if authorized by regulations of the commission, fishing an entire unit of gear in a fishery in which the commission has issued entry permits for less than a unit of gear under AS

16.43.270(d)

; under this paragraph, a person may not hold more than two entry permits for a fishery; however, the person may not

fish more than one unit of gear in the fishery; or

acquire a second entry permit for the fishery after the person has acquired an entry permit that authorizes the use of an entire unit of gear in the fishery;

consolidation of the fishing fleet for a salmon fishery; however, a person may hold not more than two entry permits for a salmon fishery under this paragraph, but the person who holds two entry permits for a salmon fishery may not engage in fishing under the second entry permit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 134 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For penalties for violation of subsection (a) of this section, see AS

16.43.970(g)

and (h). For exception to provisions of (c)(5) of this section, see AS

16.05.251(i)

.

Administrative Code. —

For permits and vessel license required, see 20 AAC 5, art. 1.

For fishery identification system, administrative areas and annual fees, see 20 AAC 5, art. 2.

For transfer of entry and interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 17.

Sec. 16.43.150.
Terms and conditions of entry permit; annual renewal.

Except as may be otherwise provided under AS

16.43.270(d)

, an entry permit authorizes the permittee to operate a unit of gear within a specified fishery.

The holder of an entry permit shall have the permit in possession at all times when engaged in the operation of gear for which it was issued.

Each entry permit is issued for a term of one year and is renewable annually.

Failure to renew an entry permit for a period of two years from the year of last renewal results in a forfeiture of the entry permit to the commission, except as waived by the commission for good cause. An entry permit may not be renewed until the fees for each preceding year during which the entry permit was not renewed are paid. However, failure to renew an entry permit in a year in which there is an administrative closure for the entire season for a specific fishery is good cause not to renew the entry permit. The commission shall waive the payment of fees for that year.

An entry permit constitutes a use privilege that may be modified or revoked by the legislature without compensation.

Except for permits that are not transferable under AS

16.43.170(e)

, an entry permit survives the death of the holder.

Except as provided in AS

16.10.333

—

16.10.338

, AS

44.81.215

,

44.81.225

, and

44.81.231

—

44.81.250

, an entry permit may not be

pledged, mortgaged, leased, or encumbered in any way;

transferred with any retained right of repossession or foreclosure, or on any condition requiring a subsequent transfer; or

attached, distrained, or sold on execution of judgment or under any other process or order of any court, except as provided in AS

16.43.170(g)

and (h).

Unless an entry permit holder has expressed a contrary intent in a will that is probated, the commission shall, upon the death of the permit holder, transfer the permanent permit by right of survivorship directly to the surviving spouse or, if no spouse survives, to a natural person designated by the permit holder on a form provided by the commission. If no spouse survives and if the person designated on the form, if any, does not survive, the permit passes as part of the permit holder’s estate. A designation under this subsection must be acknowledged before a person authorized to administer an oath under AS

09.63.010

or must be witnessed by two persons who are qualified under AS

13.12.505

to witness the will of the permit holder. Except as provided in AS

16.10.333

—

16.10.337

, AS

44.81.215

, and

44.81.231

—

44.81.250

, the permit is exempt from the claims of creditors of the estate.

The holder of a transferable or nontransferable entry permit or of an interim-use permit may voluntarily relinquish the permit to the commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am §§ 1, 2 ch 73 SLA 1977; am § 6 ch 83 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 47 SLA 1981; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 145 SLA 1984; am § 8 ch 21 SLA 1985; am §§ 1, 2 ch 22 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 139 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 82 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 34 SLA 1996; am § 17 ch 75 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 135 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and vessel license required, see 20 AAC 5, art. 1.

For fishery identification system, administrative areas and annual fees, see 20 AAC 5, art. 2.

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

For priority classification point system, see 20 AAC 5, art. 6.

For transfer of entry and interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 17.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A limited entry fishing permit does not have the status of a property right such that otherwise constitutional legislative changes to the nature of a limited entry permit would require the payment of compensation.
August 6, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.43.160.
Fees.

Except as specifically provided in this section, the commission shall establish annual fees for the issuance and annual renewal of entry permits or interim-use permits.

The commission may charge interest at a rate not to exceed the legal rate of interest established in AS

45.45.010

on fees more than 60 days overdue.

The annual base fee for issuance or renewal of an entry permit or an interim-use permit may not be less than $30 or more than $3,000. The annual base fee must reasonably reflect the different rates of economic return for different fisheries. In addition to the annual base fee established by the commission under this subsection, a nonresident shall pay an annual nonresident surcharge for the issuance or renewal of one or more entry permits or interim-use permits. The commission shall establish the annual nonresident surcharge by regulation at an amount that is as close as is practicable to the maximum allowed by law.

The holder of a permit whose household income, assets, and financial resources fall within the eligibility standards for the food stamp program under 7 U.S.C. 2011 — 2025, as amended, is subject to an annual base fee for the issuance or renewal of an entry permit or an interim-use permit that is equal to 50 percent of the annual base fee that the permit holder would otherwise pay under (c) of this section. In addition to the reduced annual base fee under this subsection, a nonresident who qualifies for a reduced fee under this subsection shall pay the annual nonresident surcharge established under (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 15 ch 105 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 123 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 1982; am §§ 3, 4 ch 22 SLA 1985; am §§ 4, 5, 7 ch 27 SLA 2001; am § 5 ch 20 SLA 2002; am E.O. 106 § 2 (2003); am § 1 ch 31 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 53 SLA 2004; am § 11 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 16 SLA 2005; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 2005; am §§ 6, 7 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003 “and Workforce Development” was inserted after “Labor” in former (e)(2)(A)(v) of this section to correct a manifest error in
ch. 27, SLA 2001.

In 2004, in former (e) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3,
ch. 47, SLA 2004.

The amendment to former subsection (e) made by sec. 2, ch. 31, SLA 2005 was not given effect due to the prior repeal and reenactment of this section in sec. 3, ch. 16, SLA 2005.

Administrative Code. —

For fishery identification system, administrative areas and annual fees, see 20 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 16.43.170.
Transfer of entry permits.

Except as provided in AS

16.10.333

—

16.10.338

and in AS

44.81.231

—

44.81.250

, entry permits and interim-use permits are transferable only through the commission as provided in this section and AS

16.43.180

and under regulations adopted by the commission. An involuntary transfer of an entry permit in a manner inconsistent with the statutes of this state and the regulations of the commission is void.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, the holder of an entry permit may transfer the permit to another person or to the commission upon 60 days notice of intent to transfer under regulations adopted by the commission. No sooner than 60 days nor later than 12 months from the date of notice to the commission, the holder of an entry permit may transfer the permit. If the proposed transferee, other than the commission, can demonstrate the present ability to participate actively in the fishery and the transfer does not violate any provision of this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter, and if a certificate for the permit under AS

16.10.333(b)(1)

— (2),

16.10.338

, or AS

44.81.231(a)

is not in effect, the commission shall approve the transfer and reissue the entry permit to the transferee provided that neither party is prohibited by law from participating in the transfer.

[Repealed, § 10 ch 135 SLA 2002.]

[Repealed, § 9 ch 73 SLA 1977.]

The holder of an entry permit who qualified for that entry permit in a priority classification designated under AS

16.43.250(c)

may not transfer that permit.

The permanent transfer of an entry permit is void if proceedings in which commercial fishing privileges and licenses may be suspended under AS

16.05.710

are pending against the permit holder at the time of transfer unless the transfer of the entry permit is allowed by order of the court in which the proceedings are pending.

A person may request the commission to transfer an entry permit due to an execution on a permit holder’s interest in that permit if the execution is to enforce a lien recorded with the commission under AS

25.27.230(c)

. The request shall be made in the form and manner provided in this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter. The commission may deny a request for transfer of an entry permit due to an execution of a holder’s interest in that permit if

the execution does not comply with legal requirements or otherwise is not valid;

the transfer violates this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter;

the proposed transferee or other party to the transfer is prohibited by law from participating in the transaction;

a certificate for the permit under AS

16.10.333(b)(1)

— (2),

16.10.338

, or AS

44.81.231(a)

is in effect at the time of the proposed transfer;

the proposed transferee of the entry permit, other than the commission, cannot demonstrate the present ability to actively participate in the fishery; or

the holder of the entry permit as shown by the records of the commission demonstrates, under regulations adopted by the commission, that the entry permit is a necessary means of support for the holder and those dependent upon the holder.

Notwithstanding (g) of this section, the commission may not approve a request for transfer of an entry permit after an execution sale unless the parties to the transfer offer the commission a right to purchase the permit at the same price and on the same terms as those of that execution sale. If the commission exercises its right to purchase the permit, the permit then shall be transferred to the commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 126 SLA 1974; am §§ 3, 4, 9 ch 73 SLA 1977; am § 7 ch 83 SLA 1978; am § 13 ch 72 SLA 1979; am § 2 ch 51 SLA 1980; am §§ 3, 4 ch 47 SLA 1981; am § 10 ch 145 SLA 1984; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 1989; am § 16 ch 211 SLA 1990; am §§ 2, 3 ch 55 SLA 1992; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 34 SLA 1996; am §§ 3, 4, 10 ch 135 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 138 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For priority classification point system, see 20 AAC 5, art. 6.

For transfer of entry and interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 17.

Legislative history reports. —

For Governor’s transmittal letter in connection with the amendment of (b) of this section and the addition of (g)-(h) of this section by §§ 2-3, ch. 55, SLA 1992 (CSSB 449 (JUD)), see 1992 Senate Journal, p. 2402.

Sec. 16.43.180.
Emergency transfers.

The commission shall adopt regulations providing for the temporary emergency transfer of entry permits and interim-use permits when illness, disability, death, required military or government service, or other unavoidable hardship prevents the permit holder from participating in the fishery. To alleviate hardship pending a final determination of the permit holder’s eligibility for an entry permit, the commission shall adopt regulations providing for the temporary emergency transfer of an interim-use permit issued under AS

16.43.210(b)

or

16.43.225

.

The commission shall adopt regulations providing for the temporary transfer of an entry permit upon the death of the permittee pending final disposition of the permit as a part of the permittee’s estate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 5 ch 73 SLA 1977; am § 5 ch 123 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 34 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For transfer of entry and interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 17.

Sec. 16.43.182.
Entry permit deductible as business expense. [Repealed, § 36 ch 14 SLA 1987.]